Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-548
Certificates; failure to renew; notice; late renewal; fee.

If a holder of a certificate of authority or certificate of registration fails to apply for renewal and to pay the fee provided, the board shall send by registered or certified mail to such holder a notice that the certificate or certificates have expired and are no longer valid authority for such individual or business entity to engage in the business of abstracting. Such notice shall be mailed not more than thirty days following the certificate expiration date. Any holder who fails to apply for renewal or pay the renewal fees prescribed in section 76-547 may file a late renewal application and shall pay, in addition to the renewal fee, ten dollars for each month or fraction thereof that the application is late beginning with April 1, except that such application shall be filed before July 1 of the year of expiration.

Laws 1965, c. 453, § 16, p. 1443;

Laws 1973, LB 330, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-524;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 18.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).